Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-3402
Definitions, where found.

For purposes of the Genetic
Counseling Practice Act, the definitions found in sections 38-3403 to 38-3414
shall apply.

Laws 2012, LB831, § 2.